Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3414
Supervision, defined.

Supervision means the overall
responsibility to assess the work of a supervisee, including regular meetings
and chart review by a qualified supervisor pursuant to an annual supervision
contract signed by the qualified supervisor and the supervisee which is on
file with both parties. The presence of a qualified supervisor is not required
during the performance of services by the supervisee.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 14.